Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 9.
SUPREME COURT.

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment was proposed by the General Assembly at the 1923 session (see Acts 1923, S.J.R. 1, p. 796) and approved at the general election of Oct. 7, 1924, by vote of 52,151 for and 40,955 against. It was declared adopted in Brickhouse v. Hill, 167 Ark. 513, 268 S.W. 865 (1925).

Effective Dates.

Ark. Const. Amend. 9, § 3: effective 60 days after approval and adoption by the people of the State of Arkansas.

§ 1. Enlargement — Sitting in division.

The Supreme Court shall be composed of five judges, one of whom shall be styled Chief Justice and elected as such, any three of whom shall in every case be necessary to a decision. Provided if it should hereafter become necessary to increase the number of the judges of the Supreme Court, the Legislature may provide for two additional judges and may also provide for the court sitting in divisions under such regulations as may be prescribed by law; provided further, that should the court sit in divisions, in all cases where the construction of the Constitution is involved, the cause shall be heard by the court in banc, and in all cases when a judge of a division dissents from the opinion therein, at the request of the Chief Justice, or such dissenting justice, the cause shall be transferred to the court in banc for its decision.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1925, No. 205, § 1, increased the number of judges to seven.

§ 2. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

Ark. Const. Amend. 94, which repealed this section effective November 5, 2014, was proposed by H.J.R. 1009 during the 2013 Regular Session and adopted at the November 2014 general election by a vote of 428,206 for and 388,459 against.

Before repeal, this section read:

“§ 2. Compensation of judges.

“The Supreme Court judges shall at stated times receive compensation for their services to be fixed by law. When the salary of the judges under this amendment to the Constitution shall have been established by law, such salary shall not thereafter be increased or diminished during their respective terms. Until otherwise provided by law, the judges of the Supreme Court shall each receive a salary of Seven thousand five hundred dollars per annum.” For current provision concerning compensation of justices, see Ark. Const., Art. 19, § 31.